Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1099
Examination by Director of Insurance.

(1) The Director of Insurance, or any person he or she may appoint, may examine any domestic, foreign, or alien society transacting or applying for admission to transact business in this state in the same manner as authorized for examination of domestic, foreign, or alien insurers. Requirements of notice and an opportunity to respond before findings are made public as provided in the laws regulating insurers shall also be applicable to the examination of societies.

(2) The expense of each examination and of each valuation, including compensation and actual expense of examiners, shall be paid by the society examined or whose certificates are valued, upon statements furnished by the Director of Insurance.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 28.